Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 4. Discipline and Investigation.

Sec. 06.60.200.
Disciplinary action.

In addition to other disciplinary action allowed under this chapter or under AS 06.01, the department may deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a license or take other disciplinary action against a person subject to this chapter, including action under a regulation adopted under this chapter, if the department finds that the person

fails to comply with an applicable provision of this title, an applicable regulation adopted under this title, a lawful demand, ruling, order, or requirement of the department, or other state or federal statute or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s business;

fails to meet the minimum standards for issuance or renewal of a license; or

knowingly withholds material information or negligently makes a material misstatement in an application for or renewal of a license.

The department may

order a person subject to this chapter to cease and desist from conducting business, including an immediate temporary order to cease and desist;

order a person subject to this chapter to cease and desist from violating this chapter, including an immediate temporary order to cease and desist;

impose a fine on a person subject to this chapter under AS

06.60.420

;

issue an order of rescission, restitution, or disgorgement directed to a person subject to this chapter for a violation of this chapter;

order other affirmative action that the department considers necessary, including an accounting, an asset freeze, or the appointment of a receiver.

A disciplinary action under this section may be taken by itself or in conjunction with one or more other disciplinary actions under this chapter or under AS 06.01.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 37 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

Sec. 06.60.210.
Suspension, revocation, or renewal related to fund.

When an award is made from the fund, the department may suspend, revoke, or decline to renew the license of the mortgage loan originator licensee whose actions formed the basis of the award.

The department shall lift a suspension made under (a) of this section if the mortgage loan originator licensee reaches an agreement with the department on terms and conditions for the repayment to the fund of the money awarded to the claimant and the costs of hearing the fund claim. The department may reimpose the suspension if the mortgage loan originator licensee violates the terms of a repayment agreement entered into under this subsection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 38 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.230.
Divestment.

If the department revokes a mortgage license, the mortgage licensee shall divest itself of all outstanding loans that were issued under this chapter by selling or assigning them to another mortgage licensee. Divestment under this section must be approved by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 39 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.240.
Reinstatement.

The department may reinstate a suspended license if the licensee complies with this chapter or with a demand, ruling, or requirement made by the department under this chapter. Before reinstatement of a license, the licensee shall pay any fees, restitution, and civil penalties owing under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 40 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.250.
Investigation and examination authority.

For the purpose of initial licensing, license renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license revocation, license termination, or general or specific inquiry or investigation to determine compliance with this chapter, including compliance by a registered depository institution, the department may access, receive, use, and copy any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including

criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction information; in this paragraph, “nonconviction information” has the meaning given in AS

12.62.900

;

personal history and experience information, including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency; and

other documents, information, and evidence the department considers relevant to the inquiry or investigation, regardless of the location, possession, or custody of the documents, information, or evidence.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.015

, for the purpose of investigating violations or complaints arising under this chapter, or for the purpose of examination, the department may review, investigate, or examine an applicant, licensee, or another person subject to this chapter as often as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The department may conduct an examination without prior notice to the licensee.

A licensee or other person subject to this chapter shall make available to the department, on request, the place of business, books, records, accounts, safes, and vaults relating to the operations of the licensee or other person subject to this chapter. The department may interview the officers, principals, mortgage loan originators, employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers of the licensee or other person subject to this chapter concerning the licensee’s or other person’s business.

For the purpose of hearings, investigations, or other proceedings under this chapter, the department or an officer designated by the department may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records that the department considers relevant or material to the matter.

If a person refuses to comply with a subpoena, the superior court, on application by the department, may issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the department to produce documentary evidence or to give evidence regarding the matter under investigation or in question.

A licensee or other person subject to this chapter shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the department to carry out the purposes of this section, including

accounting compilations;

information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the department; and

other information considered necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

In making an examination or investigation authorized by this chapter, the department may control access to documents and records of the licensee or other person under examination or investigation. The department may take possession of the documents and records or place a person in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the place where they are usually kept. During the period of control, a person may not remove or attempt to remove any of the documents and records except under a court order or with the consent of the department. In this subsection, “control” does not have the meaning given in AS

06.60.990

.

To carry out the purposes of this section, the department may

retain attorneys, accountants, or other professionals and specialists, including examiners, auditors, or investigators, to conduct or assist in the conduct of examinations or investigations;

enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations to improve efficiency and reduce the regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information, and evidence obtained under this section;

use, hire, contract, or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods, or electronic software to examine or investigate the licensee, individual, or other person subject to this chapter;

accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials in this or another state;

share information received or collected during an examination, investigation, or other proceeding with other law enforcement agencies; or

accept an audit report prepared by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee or other person subject to this chapter and may incorporate an audit report in the report of the examination or other writing of the department.

The authority under this section remains in effect, whether or not a licensee or other person subject to this chapter acts or claims to act under a licensing or registration law of the state or claims to act without the authority of a licensing or registration law of the state.

A licensee or other person subject to investigation or examination under this section may not knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information.

A person shall reimburse the department for reasonable costs incurred by the department to conduct an examination or investigation under this section. The reimbursement under this subsection may not exceed the rate of $75 an hour for the examination or investigation, plus travel costs, including a per diem allowance that does not exceed the per diem allowance for employees of the state under AS

39.20.110

.

In this section, “person” and “person subject to this chapter” include a registered depository institution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 41 ch 61 SLA 2010; am §§ 15, 16 ch 51 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 3 AAC 14, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in the introductory language in (a), inserted “including compliance by a registered depository institution,” following “this chapter,”; added (

l

).

Sec. 06.60.260.
Revocation, removal, or suspension of mortgage loan originator licensee.

If the department finds that a mortgage loan originator licensee is dishonest, reckless, or incompetent when operating as a mortgage loan originator or fails to comply with applicable law, with regulations or orders of the department, or with written requirements or instructions of the department relating to the mortgage loan originator license, the department may revoke or suspend the mortgage loan originator license, remove the mortgage loan originator licensee from operating as a mortgage loan originator in the state, or order a person licensed under this title to remove the mortgage loan originator licensee from operating as a mortgage loan originator for the person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 42 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For business duties and restrictions, and disciplinary action, see 3 AAC 14, art. 6.

Sec. 06.60.270.
Removal by entity.

A mortgage licensee shall remove a mortgage loan originator licensee from acting as a mortgage loan originator for the mortgage licensee if the department directs the mortgage licensee to remove the mortgage loan originator licensee under AS

06.60.260

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 43 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.280.
Department list.

The department shall make available to the public a list of all licensees who have been censured or barred or had their licenses suspended or revoked under this chapter. The department shall update the list on a monthly basis.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.290.
Report to the registry.

Notwithstanding AS

06.01.025

, the department shall regularly report violations of this chapter, as well as enforcement actions and other relevant information, to the registry, subject to provisions established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 44 ch 61 SLA 2010)